District of Columbia statutes.
47-1032

Daughters of American Revolution — Square 173 — Lots 4, 5, 6, 7, and 11.

The property situated in square 173 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lots 4, 5, 6, 7, and 11, inclusive, occupied by the Daughters of the American Revolution, is hereby exempt from and after February 23, 1916, from all taxation so long as the same is so occupied and used, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemptions of church and school property, and acts amendatory thereof.

Mar. 3, 1917, 39 Stat. 1009, ch. 160
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1032.
1973 Ed., § 47-825.